District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.07

Advisory board.

(a)

In addition to the executive board, there shall be a standing advisory board consisting of 9 members, who shall be residents of the District.

(b)

The executive board may create additional advisory boards as it considers appropriate.

(c)

The executive board shall solicit the recommendations of, and consult with, the advisory boards on:

(1)

Insurance standards;

(2)

Covered benefits;

(3)

Premiums;

(4)

Plan certification;

(5)

Internet technology system development; and

(6)

Any other policy or operational issues, within the executive board’s discretion.

(d)

The executive board shall:

(1)

Select the members of the advisory boards;

(2)

Establish the terms of the members;

(3)

Ensure that at least one member of the standing advisory board demonstrates expertise as a health insurance broker or agent;

(4)

Appoint the chair of the standing advisory board;

(5)

Determine the residency requirement of any additional advisory board created; and

(6)

Appoint the chair of any additional advisory boards created.

(e)

(1)

An advisory board member may continue to serve until the appointment of his or her successor.

(2)

Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the executive board for the unexpired term of the appointee’s predecessor.

(f)

Each person appointed to an advisory board shall have demonstrated and acknowledged expertise on issues related to at least one of the following groups:

(1)

Health professionals;

(2)

Health insurance consumers;

(3)

Disease and demographic-specific advocacy groups;

(4)

Commercial sector health plans;

(5)

Public sector health plans;

(6)

Health insurance brokers;

(7)

Health care consumer interest advocacy;

(8)

Health care foundations;

(9)

Exchange consumers; or

(10)

Such other interests considered necessary.

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 8, 59 DCR 213